California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 280F of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation on depreciation for luxury automobiles; limitation where certain property used for personal purposes, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 27.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17201.2.

(a) The amendments made by Section 13531(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (Public Law 115-97) to add Section 162(r) to the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the disallowance of FDIC premiums paid by certain large financial institutions, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) For purposes of this section, Article 9 (commencing with Section 23361) of Chapter 2 of Part 11 shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 39, Sec. 8.   (AB 91)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

17201.3.

(a) Section 215 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to alimony, etc., payments, as it read on January 1, 2015, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply for any divorce or separation instrument executed after December 31, 2025, or for any divorce or separation instrument executed on or before December 31, 2025, and modified after that date, if the modification expressly provides that the amendments made by this subdivision apply to such modification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 9.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

17201.4.

Section 179B of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to deductions for capital costs incurred in complying with Environmental Protection Agency sulfur regulations, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 19.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17201.5.

Section 181 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of certain qualified film and television productions, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 20.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17201.6.

Section 199A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified business income, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 29.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17201.7.

The amendments made by Section 302(b)(2) of Division O of the Further Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2020 (Public Law 116-94) to Section 221(e)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to coordination with deduction for student loan interest, shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 557, Sec. 4.   (AB 340)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

17202.

There shall be allowed to an employer as an ordinary and necessary expense paid or incurred during the taxable year in carrying on any trade or business (as provided in Section 162(a) of the Internal Revenue Code), the expenses involved in carrying out a parking cash-out program, as defined by subdivision (f) of Section 65088.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 554, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

17203.

For purposes of applying limitations on the deductions described in this section, any reference to “compensation” or “earned income” shall be a reference to the amount required to be used for purposes of limiting the deduction in computing federal income tax for the same taxable year.

(a) The deduction allowed by Section 219 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) The deductions allowed by Sections 162(l) and 404 of the Internal
 Revenue Code in the case of an individual who is an employee within the meaning of Section 401(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 473, Sec. 1.   Effective September 13, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

17204.

(a) Section 165(h)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for losses in federally declared disasters, shall not apply.

(b) Section 165(h)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation for taxable years 2018 to 2025, shall not apply.

(c) The amendments by Section 11028(c) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for personal casualty losses related to 2016 major disaster, shall not apply.

(d) The amendments made by Section 304 of Division EE of Title
 III of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) to Section 165(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified disaster-related personal casualty losses, shall not apply.

(e) Section 2 of the Federal Disaster Tax Relief Act of 2023 (Public Law 118-148), relating to extension of rules for treatment of certain disaster-related personal casualty losses, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 30.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17204.2.

The amendments made by Section 11050 of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 165(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to wagering losses, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 31.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17206.

(a) For purposes of Section 17201, Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to charitable, etc., contributions and gifts, shall be applied to allow a taxpayer to elect to treat any contribution described in subdivision (b) made in January 2005, as if that contribution was made on December 31, 2004, and not in January 2005.

(b) A contribution is described in this subdivision if that
 contribution is a cash contribution made for the relief of victims in areas affected by the December 26, 2004, Indian Ocean tsunami for which a charitable contribution deduction is allowable under Section 17201.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 17.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17207.

(a) An excess disaster loss, as defined in subdivision (c), shall be carried to other taxable years as provided in subdivision (b), with respect to losses resulting from any of the following disasters:

(1) Forest fire or any other related casualty occurring in 1985 in California.

(2) Storm, flooding, or any other related casualty
 occurring in 1986 in California.

(3) Any loss sustained during 1987 as a result of a forest fire or any other related casualty.

(4) Earthquake, aftershock, or any other related casualty occurring in 1987 in California.

(5) Earthquake, aftershock, or any other related casualty occurring in 1989 in California.

(6) Any loss sustained during 1990 as a result of fire or any other related casualty in California.

(7) Any loss sustained as a result of the Oakland/Berkeley Fire of 1991, or any other related casualty.

(8) Any loss sustained as a result of storm, flooding, or any other related casualty occurring in February 1992 in
 California.

(9) Earthquake, aftershock, or any other related casualty occurring in April 1992 in the County of Humboldt.

(10) Riots, arson, or any other related casualty occurring in April or May 1992 in California.

(11) Any loss sustained as a result of the earthquakes that occurred in the County of San Bernardino in June and July of 1992, or any other related casualty.

(12) Any loss sustained as a result of the Fountain Fire that occurred in the County of Shasta, or as a result of either of the fires in the Counties of Calaveras and Trinity that occurred in August 1992, or any other related casualty.

(13) Any loss sustained as a result of storm, flooding, or any other related casualty
 that occurred in the Counties of Alpine, Contra Costa, Fresno, Humboldt, Imperial, Lassen, Los Angeles, Madera, Mendocino, Modoc, Monterey, Napa, Orange, Plumas, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, Santa Barbara, Sierra, Siskiyou, Sonoma, Tehama, Trinity, and Tulare, and the City of Fillmore in January 1993.

(14) Any loss sustained as a result of a fire that occurred in the Counties of Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, and Ventura, during October or November of 1993, or any other related casualty.

(15) Any loss sustained as a result of the earthquake, aftershocks, or any other related casualty that occurred in the Counties of Los Angeles, Orange, and Ventura on or after January 17, 1994.

(16) Any loss sustained as a result of a fire that occurred in the County of San Luis Obispo during
 August of 1994, or any other related casualty.

(17) Any loss sustained as a result of the storms or flooding occurring in 1995, or any other related casualty, sustained in any county of this state subject to a disaster declaration with respect to the storms and flooding.

(18) Any loss sustained as a result of the storms or flooding occurring in December 1996 or January 1997, or any related casualty, sustained in any county of this state subject to a disaster declaration with respect to the storms or flooding.

(19) Any loss sustained as a result of the storms or flooding occurring in February 1998, or any related casualty, sustained in any county of this state subject to a disaster declaration with respect to the storms or flooding.

(20) Any loss
 sustained as a result of a freeze occurring in the winter of 1998–99, or any related casualty, sustained in any county of this state subject to a disaster declaration with respect to the freeze.

(21) Any loss sustained as a result of an earthquake occurring in September 2000, that was included in the Governor’s proclamation of a state of emergency for the County of Napa.

(22) Any loss sustained as a result of the Middle River levee break in San Joaquin County occurring in June 2004.

(23) Any losses sustained as a result of the fires that occurred in the Counties of Los Angeles, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, and Ventura in October and November 2003, or as a result of floods, mudflows, and debris flows, directly related to fires.

(24) Any losses
 sustained in the Counties of Santa Barbara and San Luis Obispo as a result of the San Simeon earthquake, aftershocks, and any other related casualties.

(25) Any losses sustained as a result of the wildfires that occurred in Shasta County, commencing August 11, 2004, and any other related casualty.

(26) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Kern, Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, Santa Barbara, and Ventura as a result of the severe rainstorms, related flooding and slides, and any other related casualties, that occurred in December 2004, January 2005, February 2005, March 2005, or June 2005.

(27) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Alameda, Alpine, Amador, Butte, Calaveras, Colusa, Contra Costa, Del Norte, El Dorado, Fresno, Humboldt, Kings, Lake, Lassen, Madera, Marin, Mariposa, Mendocino,
 Merced, Monterey, Napa, Nevada, Placer, Plumas, Sacramento, San Joaquin, San Luis Obispo, San Mateo, Santa Cruz, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Solano, Sonoma, Stanislaus, Sutter, Trinity, Tulare, Tuolumne, Yolo, and Yuba as a result of the severe rainstorms, related flooding and slides, and any other related casualties, that occurred in December 2005, January 2006, March 2006, or April 2006.

(28) Any loss sustained in the County of San Bernardino as a result of the wildfires that occurred in July 2006.

(29) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Riverside and Ventura as a result of wildfires that occurred during the 2006 calendar year.

(30) Any loss sustained in the Counties of El Dorado, Fresno, Imperial, Kern, Kings, Madera, Merced, Monterey, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Santa
 Clara, Stanislaus, Tulare, Ventura, and Yuba that were the subject of the Governor’s proclamations of a state of emergency for the severe freezing conditions that occurred in January 2007.

(31) Any loss sustained in the County of El Dorado as a result of wildfires that occurred in June 2007.

(32) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Santa Barbara and Ventura as a result of the Zaca Fire that occurred during the 2007 calendar year.

(33) Any loss sustained in the County of Inyo as a result of wildfires that commenced in July 2007.

(34) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, Santa Barbara, and Ventura as a result of wildfires that occurred during the 2007 calendar year that were the subject of the
 Governor’s disaster proclamations of September 15, 2007, and October 21, 2007.

(35) Any loss sustained in the County of Riverside as a result of extremely strong and damaging winds that occurred in October 2007.

(36) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Butte, Kern, Mariposa, Mendocino, Monterey, Plumas, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, Shasta, and Trinity as a result of wildfires that occurred in May or June 2008 that were the subject of the Governor’s proclamations of a state of emergency.

(37) Any loss sustained in the County of Santa Barbara as a result of wildfires that occurred in July 2008.

(38) Any loss sustained in the County of Inyo as a result of the severe rainstorms, related flooding and landslides, and any other related casualties, that occurred
 in July 2008.

(39) Any loss sustained in the County of Humboldt as a result of wildfires that commenced in May 2008.

(40) Any loss sustained in the County of Santa Barbara as a result of wildfires that commenced in November 2008. 

(41) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Los Angeles and Ventura as a result of wildfires that commenced in October 2008 or November 2008 that were the subject of the Governor’s proclamations of a state of emergency. 

(42) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Orange, Riverside, and San Bernardino as a result of wildfires that commenced in November 2008.

(43) Any loss sustained in the County of Santa Barbara as a result of wildfires that commenced in May 2009.
 

(b) (1) In the case of any loss allowed under Section 165(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation of losses of individuals, any excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the five taxable years following the taxable year for which the loss is claimed. However, if there is any excess disaster loss remaining after the five-year period, then the applicable percentage, as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 17276, of that excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the next 10 taxable years.

(2) The entire amount of any excess disaster loss as defined in subdivision (c) shall be carried to the earliest of the taxable years to which, by reason of subdivision (b), the loss may be carried. The portion of the loss which shall be carried to each of the other taxable years shall be the excess, if any, of
 the amount of excess disaster loss over the sum of the adjusted taxable income for each of the prior taxable years to which that excess disaster loss is carried.

(c) “Excess disaster loss” means a disaster loss computed pursuant to Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code which exceeds the adjusted taxable income of the year of loss or, if the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code is made, the adjusted taxable income of the year preceding the loss.

(d) The provisions of this section and Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be applicable to any of the losses listed in subdivision (a) sustained in any county or city in this state which was proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster.

(e) Losses allowable under this section may not be taken into account in computing a net
 operating loss deduction under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, “adjusted taxable income” shall be defined by Section 1212(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(g) For losses described in paragraphs (15) to (43), inclusive, of subdivision (a), the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made on a return or amended return filed on or before the due date of the return (determined with regard to extension) for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 299, Sec. 2.   (AB 1568)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

17207.2.

(a) An excess disaster loss, as defined in subdivision (c), shall be carried to other taxable years as provided in subdivision (b), with respect to losses sustained in the County of Humboldt as a result of the earthquake that occurred in January 2010.

(b) (1) In the case of any loss allowed under Section 165(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation of losses of individuals, any excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the five taxable years following the taxable year for which the loss is claimed. However, if there is any excess disaster loss remaining after the five-year period, then the applicable percentage, as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 17276, of that excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the next 10 taxable years.

(2) The entire amount of any excess disaster loss as defined in subdivision (c) shall be carried to the earliest of the taxable years to which, by reason of subdivision (b), the loss may be carried. The portion of the loss which shall be carried to each of the other taxable years shall be the excess, if any, of the amount of excess disaster loss over the sum of the adjusted taxable income for each of the prior taxable years to which that excess disaster loss is carried.

(c) “Excess disaster loss” means a disaster loss computed pursuant to Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code which exceeds the adjusted taxable income of the year of loss or, if the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code is made, the adjusted taxable income of the year preceding the loss.

(d) The provisions of this section and Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be applicable to any of the losses listed in subdivision (a) sustained in any county or city in this state which was proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster.

(e) Losses allowable under this section may not be taken into account in computing a net operating loss deduction under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, “adjusted taxable income” shall be defined by Section 1212(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(g) For losses described in subdivision (a), the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made on a return or amended return filed on or before the due date of the return (determined with regard to extension) for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 449, Sec. 5.   (AB 1690)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

17207.3.

(a) An excess disaster loss, as defined in subdivision (c), shall be carried to other taxable years as provided in subdivision (b), with respect to losses sustained in the County of Imperial as a result of the earthquake that occurred in April 2010. 

(b) (1) In the case of any loss allowed under Section 165(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation of losses of
 individuals, any excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the five taxable years following the taxable year for which the loss is claimed. However, if there is any excess disaster loss remaining after the five-year period, then the applicable percentage, as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 17276, of that excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the next 10 taxable years.

(2) The entire amount of any excess disaster loss as defined in subdivision (c) shall be carried to the earliest of the taxable years to which, by reason of subdivision (b), the loss may be carried. The portion of the loss which shall be carried to each of the other taxable years shall be the excess, if any, of the amount of excess disaster loss over the sum of the adjusted taxable income for each of the prior taxable years to which that excess disaster loss is carried.

(c) “Excess disaster loss” means a disaster loss computed pursuant to Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code which exceeds the adjusted taxable income of the year of loss or, if the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code is made, the adjusted taxable income of the year preceding the loss.

(d) The provisions of this section and Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be applicable to any of the losses listed in subdivision (a) sustained in any county or city in this state which was proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster.

(e) Losses allowable under this section may not be taken into account in computing a net operating loss deduction under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, “adjusted taxable income” shall be defined
 by Section 1212(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(g) For losses described in subdivision (a), the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made on a return or amended return filed on or before the due date of the return (determined with regard to extension) for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 461, Sec. 6.   (AB 2136)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

17207.4.

(a) Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to additionally provide that an appraisal for the purpose of obtaining a loan of federal funds or a loan guarantee from the federal government as a result of a presidentially declared disaster, as defined by Section 1033(h)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, may be used to establish the amount of any loss described in Section 165(i)(1) or (2) of the Internal Revenue Code to the extent provided in regulations or other guidance of the Secretary of the Treasury under Section
 165(i)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, as added by Section 912 of Public Law 105-34.

(b) This section shall apply on and after August 5, 1997.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 7, Sec. 6.   Effective March 14, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17207.6.

(a) An excess disaster loss, as defined in subdivision (c), shall be carried to other taxable years as provided in subdivision (b), with respect to losses resulting from any of the following disasters:

(1) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Los Angeles and Monterey as a result of wildfires that commenced in August 2009.

(2) Any
 loss sustained in the County of Placer as a result of wildfires that commenced in August 2009. 

(3) Any loss sustained in the Counties of Calaveras, Imperial, Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Francisco, and Siskiyou as a result of winter storms that commenced in January 2010. 

(4) Any loss sustained in the County of Kern as a result of the wildfires that commenced in July 2010. 

(b) (1) In the case of any loss allowed under Section 165(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation of losses of individuals, any excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the five taxable years following the taxable year for which the loss is claimed. However, if there is any excess disaster loss remaining after the five-year period, then the applicable percentage, as set
 forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 17276, of that excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the next 10 taxable years.

(2) The entire amount of any excess disaster loss as defined in subdivision (c) shall be carried to the earliest of the taxable years to which, by reason of subdivision (b), the loss may be carried. The portion of the loss which shall be carried to each of the other taxable years shall be the excess, if any, of the amount of excess disaster loss over the sum of the adjusted taxable income for each of the prior taxable years to which that excess disaster loss is carried.

(c) “Excess disaster loss” means a disaster loss computed pursuant to Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code which exceeds the adjusted taxable income of the year of loss or, if the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code is made, the adjusted
 taxable income of the year preceding the loss.

(d) The provisions of this section and Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be applicable to any of the losses listed in subdivision (a) sustained in any county or city in this state which was proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster.

(e) Losses allowable under this section may not be taken into account in computing a net operating loss deduction under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, “adjusted taxable income” shall be defined by Section 1212(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(g) For losses described in subdivision (a), the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made on a return or amended return filed on
 or before the due date of the return (determined with regard to extension) for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 447, Sec. 5.   (AB 1662)   Effective September 29, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

17207.7.

(a) An excess disaster loss, as defined in subdivision (c), shall be carried to other taxable years as provided in subdivision (b), with respect to losses sustained in the County of Mendocino as a result of the tsunami that occurred in March 2011.

(b) (1) In the case of any loss allowed under Section 165(c) of
 the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation of losses of individuals, any excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the five taxable years following the taxable year for which the loss is claimed. However, if there is any excess disaster loss remaining after the five-year period, then the applicable percentage, as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 17276, of that excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the next 10 taxable years.

(2) The entire amount of any excess disaster loss as defined in subdivision (c) shall be carried to the earliest of the taxable years to which, by reason of subdivision (b), the loss may be carried. The portion of the loss which shall be carried to each of the other taxable years shall be the excess, if any, of the amount of excess disaster loss over the sum of the adjusted taxable income for each of the prior taxable years to which that excess disaster loss is
 carried.

(c) “Excess disaster loss” means a disaster loss computed pursuant to Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code which exceeds the adjusted taxable income of the year of loss or, if the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code is made, the adjusted taxable income of the year preceding the loss.

(d) This section and Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code apply to any of the losses listed in subdivision (a) sustained in any county or city in this state which was proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster.

(e) Losses allowable under this section shall not be taken into account in computing a net operating loss deduction under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, “adjusted
 taxable income” shall be defined by Section 1212(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(g) For losses described in subdivision (a), the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made on a return or amended return filed on or before the due date of the return (determined with regard to extension) for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 469.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17207.8.

(a) An excess disaster loss, as defined in subdivision (c), shall be carried to other taxable years as provided in subdivision (b), with respect to losses sustained in the County of San Mateo as a result of the explosion and fire that occurred in September 2010.

(b) (1) In the case of any loss allowed under
 Section 165(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation of losses of individuals, any excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the five taxable years following the taxable year for which the loss is claimed. However, if there is any excess disaster loss remaining after the five-year period, then the applicable percentage, as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 17276, of that excess disaster loss shall be carried forward to each of the next 10 taxable years.

(2) The entire amount of any excess disaster loss as defined in subdivision (c) shall be carried to the earliest of the taxable years to which, by reason of subdivision (b), the loss may be carried. The portion of the loss which shall be carried to each of the other taxable years shall be the excess, if any, of the amount of excess disaster loss over the sum of the adjusted taxable income for each of the prior taxable years to which that
 excess disaster loss is carried.

(c) “Excess disaster loss” means a disaster loss computed pursuant to Section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code which exceeds the adjusted taxable income of the year of loss or, if the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code is made, the adjusted taxable income of the year preceding the loss.

(d) This section and Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code apply to any of the losses listed in subdivision (a) sustained in any county or city in this state which was proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of disaster.

(e) Losses allowable under this section shall not be taken into account in computing a net operating loss deduction under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(f) For purposes of
 this section, “adjusted taxable income” shall be defined by Section 1212(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(g) For losses described in subdivision (a), the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made on a return or amended return filed on or before the due date of the return (determined with regard to extension) for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 470.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17207.11.

(a) Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be applicable to any losses sustained in the County of Santa Cruz as a result of the severe storms that occurred in March 2011.

(b) For losses described in subdivision (a), the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made on a return or amended return filed on or before the due date of the return, determined with
 regard to extension, for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred.

(c) Unless specifically provided otherwise, any law that suspends, defers, reduces, or otherwise diminishes the deduction of a net operating loss shall not apply to a net operating loss attributable to the loss described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 203, Sec. 1.   (AB 2332)   Effective August 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

17207.12.

(a) Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be applicable to any losses sustained in the Counties of Los Angeles and San Bernardino as a result of the severe winds that occurred in November 2011.

(b) For losses described in subdivision (a), the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made on a return or amended return filed on or before the due date of the
 return, determined with regard to extension, for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred.

(c) Unless specifically provided otherwise, any law that suspends, defers, reduces, or otherwise diminishes the deduction of a net operating loss shall not apply to a net operating loss attributable to the loss described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 284, Sec. 1.   (SB 1544)   Effective September 7, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

17207.13.

(a) Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be applicable to any losses sustained in the County of San Diego as a result of the wildfires that occurred in May 2014. 

(b) For losses described in subdivision (a), the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made on a return or amended return filed on or before the due date of the return, determined with regard to
 extension, for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred. 

(c) Unless specifically provided otherwise, any law that suspends, defers, reduces, or otherwise diminishes the deduction of a net operating loss shall not apply to a net operating loss attributable to the loss described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 352, Sec. 1.   (AB 922)   Effective September 16, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

17207.14.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, and before January 1, 2029, Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to disaster losses, shall be applicable to any loss sustained as a result of any disaster occurring in any city, county, or city and county in this state that is proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of emergency.

(b) (1) For losses described in subdivision (a), the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to disaster losses, may be made on a return or amended return filed
 on or before the due date of the return, determined with regard to any extension of time for filing the return, for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 18572, this subdivision shall apply to any loss described in subdivision (a).

(c) Unless specifically provided otherwise, any law, other than Section 17276, that suspends, defers, reduces, or otherwise diminishes the deduction of a net operating loss shall not apply to a net operating loss attributable to the loss described in subdivision (a).

(d) (1) For purposes of complying with Section 41, as it applies to the deduction allowed by this section and Section 24347.14, the Legislature finds and
 declares as follows:

(A) The specific goal, purpose, and objective of the deduction is to support taxpayers whose business or personal property is completely or partially destroyed due to a disaster.

(B) The performance indicator for the Legislature to use in determining if the deduction achieves its stated purpose is the number of taxpayers allowed a deduction pursuant to this section or Section 24347.14.

(2) (A) By May 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, the Franchise Tax Board shall submit a report to the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, detailing the number of taxpayers allowed a deduction pursuant to this section and Section 24347.14.

(B) The disclosure provisions of this paragraph shall be treated as an exception to Section 19542.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1,
 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 285, Sec. 1.   (SB 264)   Effective September 30, 2023.   Repealed as of December 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17208.1.

(a) There shall be allowed as a deduction the amount of interest paid or incurred by a taxpayer during the taxable year on any loan or financed indebtedness obtained from a publicly owned utility company for the purpose of acquiring and installing any energy efficient product or equipment to a qualified residence located in this state.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Energy efficient product or
 equipment” means any product or equipment certified by a publicly owned utility company that will improve the energy efficiency, as defined by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 399.4 of the Public Utilities Code, of a qualified residence on which the product or equipment is installed or applied.

(2) “Energy efficient product or equipment” shall include, but not be limited to, heating, ventilation, air-conditioning, lighting, solar, advanced metering of energy usage, windows, insulation, zone heating products, and weatherization systems.

(3) “Zone heating products” mean gas room heaters certified by the California Energy Commission or wood fueled stoves certified by the federal Environmental Protection Agency.

(4) “Publicly owned utility company” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (d) of
 Section 9604 of the Public Utilities Code.

(5) “Qualified residence” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 163(h)(4)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(6) “Publicly owned utility company loan or financial indebtedness” means any amount borrowed from a publicly owned utility company to finance the acquisition and installation of energy efficient products and equipment installed or applied to a qualified residence located in this state.

(c) Any interest amount that is allowed as a deduction pursuant to this section (and the application of Section 17072) may not otherwise be allowed as a deduction for purposes of this part.

(d) The publicly owned utility company shall issue a federal income tax Form 1098, or similar form, for the purpose of notifying
 the taxpayer of his or her eligibility for the deduction allowed by this section.

(e) The deduction allowed by this section shall be in lieu of any credit allowed by this part for interest paid or incurred by the taxpayer in connection with the purchase of energy efficient equipment.

(f) The Legislature finds and declares that many taxpayers may be unaware that they may deduct interest paid or incurred pursuant to this section. The Legislature further finds that it is important to inform taxpayers of this deduction. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to encourage all publicly owned utility companies to inform their customers in writing that they may deduct interest paid or incurred pursuant to this section. It is the further intent of the Legislature to encourage all publicly owned utility companies that are unable to offer customer financing to acquire or install
 energy efficient products and equipment to inform their customers in writing that interest on a home equity or home improvement loan used to purchase energy efficient products and equipment may also be tax deductible.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature to inquire with the Internal Revenue Service as to whether the loan program administered by the Sacramento Municipal Utility District qualifies for an interest deduction in compliance with the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 2.   Effective October 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

17209.

(a) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2030, Section 280E of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to expenditures in connection with the illegal sale of drugs, shall not apply to the carrying on of any trade or business that is commercial cannabis activity by a licensee.

(b) For purposes of this section, “commercial cannabis activity” and “licensee” shall have the same meanings as set forth in Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.